Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 80 PET ANIMAL CARE AND FACILITIES ACT
35-80-112. Disciplinary actions - denial of license - definition.

The commissioner, pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, may issue letters of admonition or deny, suspend, refuse to renew, restrict, or revoke any license authorized under this article 80 if the applicant or licensee:

Has refused or failed to comply with any provision of this article, any rule adopted under this article, or any lawful order of the commissioner;

Has been convicted of a local, state, or federal offense involving the theft, importation, capture, neglect, or abuse of an animal; or cruelty to animals as defined in article 9 of title 18; or any similar statute of any other state;

Has had an equivalent license denied, revoked, or suspended by any authority;

Has refused to provide the commissioner with reasonable, complete, and accurate information regarding the care of animals when requested by the commissioner; or

Has falsified any information requested by the commissioner.

In any proceeding held under this section, the commissioner may accept as prima facie evidence of grounds for disciplinary action any disciplinary action taken against a licensee from another jurisdiction if the violation which prompted the disciplinary action in that jurisdiction would be grounds for disciplinary action under this section.

No licensee whose license has been revoked may apply or reapply for a license under this article 80 until two years after the date of the revocation. The two-year period of ineligibility also applies to a principal, officer, director, manager, or any other person who has substantial control or authority over the daily operations of the entity, whether the person applies individually or as a principal, officer, director, manager, or other person who has or would have substantial control or authority over the daily operations of the same or a different entity.

As used in this section, "convicted" means having entered a plea of guilty, including a plea of guilty entered pursuant to a deferred sentence under section 18-1.3-102, or a plea of no contest, accepted by the court, or having received a verdict of guilty by a judge or jury.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1308, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(3) amended, (HB 14-1270), ch. 365, p. 1747, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

IP(1), (1)(b), and (3) amended and (4) added, (SB 19-158), ch. 409, p. 3606, § 4, effective August 2.

35-80-112.5. Denial of license - animal cruelty or animal fighting conviction.

The commissioner, pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., may deny, refuse to renew, or revoke any license authorized under this article if the applicant or licensee, or any principal, officer, director, manager, or other person who has or would have substantial control or authority over the licensee or over its daily operations, has been convicted of cruelty to animals pursuant to section 18-9-202 (1)(a) or (1.5)(a), C.R.S., or any similar statute of any other state.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the commissioner, pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., shall deny, refuse to renew, or revoke any license authorized under this article if the applicant or licensee, or any principal, officer, director, manager, or other person who has or would have substantial control or authority over the licensee or over its daily operations, has been convicted, at any time, of:

Animal fighting pursuant to section 18-9-204, C.R.S., or any similar statute of any other state;

Aggravated cruelty to animals pursuant to section 18-9-202 (1.5)(b), C.R.S., or any similar statute of any other state; or

A second or subsequent conviction of cruelty to animals pursuant to section 18-9-202 (1)(a) or (1.5)(a), C.R.S., or any similar statute of any other state.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1399, § 9, effective May 30.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1270), ch. 365, p. 1747, § 10, effective July 1.

35-80-113. Civil penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any rule adopted pursuant to this article is subject to a civil penalty, as determined by the commissioner. The maximum penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per violation.

No civil penalty may be imposed unless the person charged is given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect such civil penalty or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may:

Bring suit to recover the amount of the civil penalty plus costs and attorney fees by action in any court of competent jurisdiction; or

Refuse to renew any license authorized under this article that was issued to a person who has not paid the civil penalty pursuant to section 35-80-106 (4).

Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1309, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 1894, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 2009:

(4) repealed, (SB 09-118), ch. 327, p. 1742, § 8, effective July 1.

35-80-114. Criminal penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of section 35-80-108 (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(f), or (1)(m) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1309, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1400, § 10, effective May 30.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1552, § 330, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

35-80-115. Advisory committee.

There is hereby established a pet animal advisory committee to advise the commissioner in establishing rules under this article 80 and to provide ongoing review of this article 80. The members of the advisory committee shall receive no compensation or reimbursement from the state of Colorado or the department for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The advisory committee shall consist of seventeen persons appointed by the commissioner as follows:

One person who represents animal rescue;

One person who represents bird breeders;

One person who represents small-scale operation dog breeders;

One person who represents cat breeders;

One person who represents small animal breeders;

One person who represents boarding kennels;

One person who represents the "dog day care industry", which term means premises on which dogs are kept primarily for the purpose of short-term care;

One person who represents pet groomers;

One person who represents pet animal retailers;

One person who represents pet animal wholesalers;

One person who represents animal control officers;

One person who represents animal shelters;

One veterinarian licensed pursuant to article 315 of title 12;

Three members of the general public, none of whom shall represent or have a financial interest in any of the groups listed in this subsection (1); and

One person who represents large-scale operation dog breeders.

All members of the advisory committee shall be residents of this state.

In the event of a vacancy on the advisory committee prior to the completion of the member's full term, the commissioner shall appoint a person to complete the remainder of the term. Such person shall represent the same group as the member he or she is replacing, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

The initial appointments of the animal rescue representative, the small animal breeder, the pet animal wholesaler, one member from the general public, and the large-scale operation dog breeder shall expire on January 1, 1995. The initial appointments of the bird breeder, the representative of boarding kennels, the representative of animal control officers, the small-scale operation dog breeder, and one member from the general public shall expire on January 1, 1996. The initial appointment of all other members shall be for a term of three years. Thereafter, members of the advisory committee shall serve for terms of three years.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1309, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(c), (1)(n), (4), and (5)(a) amended, p. 1400, § 11, effective May 30.

L. 2009:

IP(1) amended, (1)(f.5) added, and (5) repealed, (SB 09-118), ch. 327, p. 1741, §§ 5, 6, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

IP(1) and (1)(l) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1721, § 227, effective October 1.

35-80-116. Pet animal care and facility fund - fees - fines.

All fees collected pursuant to this article 80 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer who shall credit the fee to the pet animal care and facility fund, which fund is hereby created. All money credited to the fund is a part of the fund and shall not be transferred or credited to the general fund or to any other fund except as directed by the general assembly acting by bill. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, all interest derived from the deposit and investment of this fund shall be credited to the general fund, in accordance with section 24-36-114. The general assembly shall make annual appropriations from the fund to the department of agriculture for direct and indirect expenses incurred in carrying out the purposes of this section.

All civil fines collected pursuant to this article 80 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit them to the general fund.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1310, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-158), ch. 409, p. 3607, § 5, effective August 2.

35-80-116.5. Pet overpopulation authority - creation - duties and powers - pet overpopulation fund.

There is hereby created the Colorado pet overpopulation authority, also referred to in this section as the "authority", which shall be a body corporate and a political subdivision of the state. The authority is not an agency of state government and is not subject to administrative direction by any state agency except as provided in this article.

The powers of the Colorado pet overpopulation authority shall be vested in a board of directors consisting of the following:

One representative of the animal assistance foundation or its successor organization;

One representative of the Colorado federation of animal welfare agencies or its successor organization;

One representative of a state veterinary medical association;

One representative of an association organized for Colorado animal control officers;

One representative from the department of agriculture;

One member from an animal rescue organization;

One member of the general public with an interest in animal welfare; and

One representative of western Colorado.

The commissioner shall appoint the board members to three-year terms; except that three of the members appointed on September 1, 2001, shall serve an initial term of two years. Each member shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner and shall continue in office until the member's successor is appointed and qualified. Initial members of the authority shall be appointed no later than September 1, 2001.

On the expiration of the term of a member of the board, that member's successor shall be appointed by the commissioner for a term of three years; except that, in the case of a vacancy, the commissioner shall appoint a person who shall serve for the unexpired term.

Each board member shall meet the following qualifications at the time of appointment and throughout the member's term of office:

Residency in this state; and

Demonstration of an active interest in the education of the community regarding the benefits of pet overpopulation control in Colorado.

The commissioner shall immediately declare the office of any member of the board vacant whenever the commissioner finds that the member is not qualified under this subsection (3) or that the member is unable to perform the duties of the office.

Members shall serve without compensation for any service provided to the Colorado pet overpopulation authority. Members shall not receive any reimbursement from the board for any expenses incurred fulfilling their responsibilities pursuant to this section.

The board may:

Adopt an education program concerning pet overpopulation with emphasis on the importance of spaying and neutering to control pet overpopulation;

Develop, adopt, and implement a process to fund and expend moneys for the activities and responsibilities of the board. Funding for the board includes the moneys available in the pet overpopulation fund created in subsection (5) of this section.

Accept gifts, grants, and donations, including personal services, for the activities and responsibilities of the board. Any gift, grant, or donation other than personal services shall be deposited into the pet overpopulation fund created in subsection (5) of this section.

Develop, adopt, and implement a cooperative process to work with local veterinarians, licensed animal shelters, and local communities concerning animal sheltering and pet overpopulation control in this state.

Donations collected pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and section 39-22-2201, C.R.S., shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to the pet overpopulation fund, which fund is hereby created in the state treasury. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.

All unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the fund and not revert back to the general fund or any other fund or be used for any purpose other than the purposes set forth in this section. Such moneys shall be appropriated continually to the state treasurer, who shall transfer all available moneys in the pet overpopulation fund to the pet overpopulation authority at least quarterly unless the board expressly requests otherwise. The board shall expend moneys from the pet overpopulation fund for the implementation of this section.

When expending funds to implement this section, the Colorado pet overpopulation authority shall give priority to the areas that have an insufficient number of pet animal veterinary resources to adequately meet local needs.

There is hereby created in the pet overpopulation fund the adopt a shelter pet account, which consists of moneys donated to qualify for the adopt a shelter pet special license plate pursuant to section 42-3-234, C.R.S.

The authority shall use the moneys in the adopt a shelter pet account to support the spay and neutering and other medical costs of animals in animal shelters and rescues or to support overpopulation education programs; except that up to ten percent of the moneys in the adopt a shelter pet account may be used for the administration of the account.

Except as provided in section 42-3-234, C.R.S., the Colorado pet overpopulation authority, created pursuant to this section, shall not be funded by or through any state agency.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the Colorado pet overpopulation authority to promulgate rules to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 1053, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

(2)(a) and (6) amended and (5)(d) and (5)(e) added, (HB 10-1214), ch. 394, pp. 1871, 1872, §§ 1, 2, effective August 11.

35-80-117. Repeal of article - sunset review - report to general assembly.

This article 80 is repealed, effective September 1, 2026.

Before the repeal, the licensing functions of the commissioner are scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

On or before February 1, 2018, the commissioner shall provide a written report to the agriculture, livestock, and natural resources committee and the finance committee of the house of representatives and the agriculture, natural resources, and energy committee and the finance committee of the senate, or their successor committees, containing the following information, as of September 1, 2013, and September 1, 2017:

A schedule of the fees charged for all classes of licenses issued under this article and for renewal of those licenses;

The total revenue received by the department as a result of the fees charged for licenses and renewals under this article; and

The total number of personnel employed by the department to administer this article.

On or before February 1, 2015, and annually thereafter, the commissioner shall provide a written report to the executive committee of the legislative council, the agriculture, livestock, and natural resources committee of the house of representatives, and the agriculture, natural resources, and energy committee of the senate, or their successor committees, explaining the need for and purposes of any increase in the fee charged for any class of licenses issued under this article or for renewal of those licenses, including without limitation a statement of the number of inspections performed per month before and after the increase.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire article added, p. 1311, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 1400, § 12, effective May 30.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-118), ch. 327, p. 1740, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1270), ch. 365, p. 1744, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 19-158), ch. 409, p. 3605, § 2, effective August 2.